Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7302.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-132. Special plate for the Lime Rock Foundation, Inc.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity, Lime Rock Foundation, Inc.
The plates shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit entity Lime Rock Foundation, Inc.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular
motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by Lime Rock Foundation, Inc., in conjunction with the
division of motor vehicles, and which license plate design shall include references to the Ida Lewis
Lighthouse with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.
(d) The Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. plates shall be subject to a compliance with § 31-3-
117 relating to the number of minimum pre-paid order of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger,
commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. plates shall not be

issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the
Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for
production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paper work submitted to the
division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Lime Rock
Foundation, Inc. plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. to preserve the historic Ida Lewis
Lighthouse in Rhode Island to ensure that every person can experience preservation of the
lighthouse.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Lime Rock Foundation, Inc.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Lime Rock Foundation,
Inc. plates, the Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for
the benefit of Rhode Island based charitable organizations.
(j) Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. will be required to submit an annual accounting report
before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Lime Rock Foundation, Inc. plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC003445
========
LC003445 - Page 2 of 3